Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.170

Examination costs of sexual assault victims paid by state.

No costs incurred by a hospital or other emergency medical facility in Washington for the examination of the victim of a sexual assault, whether such assault occurred in or outside the state of Washington, when such examination is performed for the purposes of gathering evidence for possible prosecution, shall be billed or charged directly or indirectly to the victim of such assault. Such costs shall be paid by the state pursuant to this chapter.

[ 2024 c 297 s 6; 1979 ex.s. c 219 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 297: See note following RCW 7.68.127.

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 219: See note following RCW 70.125.010.